Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 8. Naloxone Hydrochloride

§ 2080.
Naloxone hydrochloride; dispensing or furnishing.

The Board of Pharmacy shall adopt protocols for licensed pharmacists to dispense or otherwise furnish naloxone hydrochloride to patients who do not hold an individual prescription for naloxone hydrochloride. Such protocols shall be consistent with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Health.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a licensed pharmacist may dispense naloxone hydrochloride to any person as long as the pharmacist complies with the protocols adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.